Utah statutes.
13-40-203.   Application of part.

(1)  This part applies to the discovery of a phishing or pharming incident that occurs on or after July 1, 2010.

(2)  This part does not apply to a telecommunications provider's or Internet service provider's good faith transmission or routing of, or intermediate temporary storing or caching of, identifying information.



Enacted by Chapter 200, 2010 General Session

